Maine, session 132, LD225.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 727 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 727
HOTEL AND LODGING PLACE TAX
§4961. Sales tax on hotel and lodging place rentals; rate of tax; application of revenue
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Hotel" has the same meaning as in section 1752, subsection 4.
B. "Living quarters" has the same meaning as in section 1752, subsection 6.
C. "Lodging place" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 2491, subsection 7-F.
2. Rate. In addition to the sales tax imposed pursuant to section 1811, subsection 1,
paragraph D, subparagraph (3), beginning January 1, 2026, a tax at the rate of 3% is
imposed on the value of rental of living quarters in a hotel or lodging place.
3. Application of tax revenue. The revenue received from the tax imposed by this
chapter must be credited directly to the Department of Education to be used to fund school
construction and kindergarten to grade 12 education.